da: Næringsstofindhold: Bor; Calcium; Kobber; Jern; Magnesium; Mangan; Molybdenum; Nitrogen; Fosfor; Kalium; Svovl; Zink; Andet
zh-CN: 营养成分含量: 硼; 钙; 铜色; 铁; 镁; 锰; 钼; 氮; 磷; 钾; 硫; 锌; 其他
sl-SI: Vsebnost hranil: Bor; Kalcij; Baker; Železo; Magnezij; Mangan; Molibden; Dušik; Fosfor; Kalij; Žveplo; Cink; Drugo
vi: Hàm lượng chất dinh dưỡng: Boron; Canxi; Màu đồng đỏ; Sắt; Magiê; Mangan; Molypden; Nitơ; Phốt pho; Kali; Lưu huỳnh; Kẽm; Khác
lt-LT: Maistinių medžiagų sudėtis: Boras; Kalcis; Varis; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Magnis; Manganas; Molibdenas; Azotas; Fosforas; Kalis; Siera; Cinkas; Kita
cs: Obsah živin: Bor; Vápník; Měděná; Železo; Hořčík; Mangan; Molybden; Dusík; Fosfor; Draslík; Síra; Zinek; Jiné
hr-HR: Sadržaj hranjivih tvari: Bor; Kalcij; Bakar; Željezo; Magnezij; Mangan; Molibden; Dušik; Fosfor; Kalij; Sumpor; Cink; Ostalo
fi: Ravintoainesisältö: Boron; Kalsium; Kupari; Rauta; Magnesium; Mangaani; Molybdeeni; Typpi; Fosfori; Kalium; Rikki; Sinkki; Muu
ja: 栄養成分: ホウ素; カルシウム; コッパー; 鉄; マグネシウム; マンガン; モリブデン; 窒素; リン; カリウム; 硫黄; 亜鉛; その他
it: Contenuto nutritivo: Boro; Calcio; Rame; Ferro; Magnesio; Manganese; Molibdeno; Azoto; Fosforo; Potassio; Zolfo; Zinco; Altro
de: Nährstoffgehalt: Boron; Kalzium; Kupfer; Eisen; Magnesium; Mangan; Molybdän; Stickstoff; Phosphor; Kalium; Schwefel; Zink; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Obsah živín: Bór; Vápnik; Meď; Železo; Magnézium; Mangán; Molybdén; Dusík; Fosfor; Draslík; Síra; Zinok; Iné
sv: Näringsinnehåll: Bor; Kalcium; Koppar; Järn; Magnesium; Mangan; Molybden; Kväve; Fosfor; Kalium; Svavel; Zink; Övrigt
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε θρεπτικά συστατικά: Βόριο; Ασβέστιο; Χαλκός; Σίδερο; Μαγνήσιο; Μαγγάνιο; Μολυβδαίνιο; Άζωτο; Φώσφορος; Κάλιο; Θείο; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
tr: Besin içeriği: Boron; Kalsiyum; Bakır; Demir; Magnezyum; Manganez; Molibden; Azot; Fosfor; Potasyum; Kükürt; Çinko; Diğer
nb: Næringsinnhold: Bor; Kalsium; Kobber; Jern; Magnesium; Mangan; Molybden; Nitrogen; Fosfor; Kalium; Svovel; Sink; Annet
pt-PT: Teor de nutrientes: Boro; Cálcio; Cobre; Ferro; Magnésio; Manganês; Molibdénio; Nitrogénio; Fósforo; Potássio; Enxofre; Zinco; Outro
zh-TW: 營養成分: 硼; 鈣; 紅銅色; 鐵; 鎂; 錳; 鉬; 氮; 磷; 鉀; 硫; 鋅; 其他
hu: Tápanyagtartalom: Bór; Kalcium; Réz; Vas; Magnézium; Mangán; Molibdén; Nitrogén; Foszfor; Kálium; Kén; Cink; Egyéb
ru: Содержание питательных веществ: Бор; Кальций; Медь; Железо; Магний; Марганец; Молибден; Азот; Фосфор; Калий; Сера; Цинк; Другое
fr: Contenu nutritif: Bore; Calcium; Cuivre; Fer; Magnésium; Manganèse; Molybdène; Azote; Phosphore; Potassium; Soufre; Zinc; Autre
es: Contenido nutritivo: Boro; Calcio; Cobre; Hierro; Magnesio; Manganeso; Molibdeno; Nitrógeno; Fósforo; Potasio; Azufre; Zinc; Otros
pl: Zawartość składników odżywczych: Bor; Wapń; Miedź; Żelazo; Magnez; Mangan; Molibden; Azot; Fosfor; Potas; Siarka; Cynk; Inne
ro-RO: Conținutul de nutrienți: Bor; Calciu; Cupru; Fier; Magneziu; Mangan; Molibden; Nitrogen; Fosfor; Potasiu; Sulf; Zinc; Altele
nl: Voedingsstoffen: Borium; Calcium; Koper; IJzer; Magnesium; Mangaan; Molybdeen; Stikstof; Fosfor; Kalium; Zwavel; Zink; Andere
bg-BG: Съдържание на хранителни вещества: Бор; Калций; Мед; Желязо; Магнезий; Манган; Молибден; Азот; Фосфор; Калий; Сяра; Цинк; Други
en: Nutrient content: Boron; Calcium; Copper; Iron; Magnesium; Manganese; Molybdenum; Nitrogen; Phosphorus; Potassium; Sulfur; Zinc; Other
ko: 영양 성분: 붕소; 칼슘; 구리; 철; 마그네슘; 망가니즈; 몰리브데넘; 질소; 인; 포타슘; 황; 아연; 기타
pt-BR: Conteúdo nutricional: Boro; Cálcio; Cobre; Ferro; Magnésio; Manganês; Molibdênio; Nitrogênio; Fósforo; Potássio; Enxofre; Zinco; Outro
th: ปริมาณสารอาหาร: โบรอน; แคลเซียม; สีทองแดง; เหล็ก; แมกนีเซียม; แมงกานีส; โมลิบดีนัม; ไนโตรเจน; ฟอสฟอรัส; โพแทสเซียม; กำมะถัน; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ